Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 5. Recovery of Personal Property.

Cross references. —

For court rule on procedure for claiming delivery, see Civ. R. 88.

Collateral references. —

66 Am. Jur. 2d, Replevin, § 1 et seq.

77 C.J.S., Replevin, § 1 et seq.

Sufficiency of proof of possession of defendant at time of commencement of action, 2 ALR2d 1043.

Conversion as precluded by resort to replevin, 3 ALR2d 230.

Credit for upkeep or other expense in computing damages for use or detention of property, 7 A.L.R.2d 933.

Remedy of replevin where agent, employed to purchase personal property, buys it for himself, 20 ALR2d 1149.

Action against landowner for recovery by possession of cut timber after his revocation of license, 26 ALR2d 1197.

Recovery of damages in replevin for value of use of property detained, by successful party having only security interest as conditional vendor, chattel mortgagee, or the like, 33 ALR2d 774.

Availability of replevin or similar possessory action to one not claiming as heir, legatee, or creditor of decedent’s estate, against personal representative, 42 ALR2d 418.

Allowance of loss of profits from deprivation of use of detained property, 48 ALR2d 1053.

County that may bring replevin, or similar possessory action, 60 ALR2d 487.

Recovery of fees as damages by successful litigant in replevin or detinue action, 60 ALR2d 945.

Maintenance of replevin or similar possessory remedy by cotenant, or security transaction creditor thereof, against other cotenants, 93 ALR2d 358.

Recovery of value of property in replevin or similar possessory action where defendant, at time of action is brought, is no longer in possession of property, 97 ALR2d 896.

Voluntary dismissal of replevin action by plaintiff as affecting defendant’s right to judgment for the return or value of the property, 24 ALR3d 768.

Modern view as to validity of statute or contractual provision authorizing summary repossession of consumer goods sold under retail installment sales contract, 45 ALR3d 1233.

Sec. 09.40.260.
Claim for delivery of personal property.

In an action to recover possession of personal property, the plaintiff may, at any time after the action is commenced and before judgment, claim the immediate delivery of the property.

History.

(§ 24.01 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.40.270.
Undertaking.

A peace officer may not take personal property into custody until the plaintiff delivers to the peace officer the affidavit and undertaking of sufficient sureties to the effect that they are bound in double the value of the property for the prosecution of the action and the return of the property to the defendant, if return be adjudged, and for the payment to the defendant of any sum that may be recovered against the plaintiff.

History.

(§ 24.02 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.40.280.
Undertaking for return of property to defendant.

The defendant may, within the time set by the court, require the return of the property upon delivering to the peace officer having custody of the property a written undertaking approved by the clerk of the court and executed by sufficient sureties to the effect that they are bound in double the value of the property for the delivery of the property to the plaintiff, if such delivery be adjudged, and for the payment to the plaintiff of such sum as may, for any cause, be recovered against the defendant.

History.

(§ 24.03 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.40.290.
Property concealed in building or enclosure, demand and entry to effect seizure.

If the property or any part of it is concealed in a building or enclosure, the peace officer shall publicly demand its delivery.
If it is not delivered, the peace officer shall cause the building or enclosure to be broken open and take the property into possession.

History.

(§ 24.04 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.40.300.
Custody of property seized.

When the peace officer has taken the property into custody, the peace officer is responsible for it and shall keep it in a secure place and deliver it to the party entitled to it upon receiving the lawful fees for taking and the necessary expenses for keeping it.

History.

(§ 24.05 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.40.310.
Third party claims.

If the property taken is claimed by any person other than the defendant, and that person makes an affidavit of title to the property or the right to the possession of it, stating the grounds of the title or right, and serves it upon the peace officer taking the property while the property is still in the peace officer’s custody, the peace officer may release the property unless the plaintiff, on demand of the officer, indemnifies the peace officer against the third party claim by a written undertaking approved by the clerk of court and executed by sufficient sureties.

History.

(§ 24.06 ch 101 SLA 1962)